inc/flattened/otw-compose-models-w-flattened-suffixes.xfscript
!!!!!
! CREATING NEW FSTs USING FLATTENED SUFFIXES
!!!!!

!!!!!
! Complete pre-syncopated model, with abstract tags and flattend suffixes
!!!!!

! Read in entire morphology with flattened suffixation
! and abstract tagging.

read lexc verb_lexicon_flattened_abstract.lexc
define FlattenedMorphology

! Read in phonological rules applying for prefixation and
! after all rules triggered by morpheme boundaries have been applied.

source phonology-only-prefix-and-postboundary-rules.xfscript
define PostPhonology

! Use flags to retain morpheme boundaries:
! 1) Attach flags to prefix boundaries, keeping them to invoke rules.
! 2) Convert all other boundaries to corresponding flags.

regex [ [..] -> "@P.Bx.Pref@" || "<" _ ,, ">" -> "@P.Bx.Suff@"
,, "<<" -> "@P.Bx.Pref2@" ,, ">>" -> "@P.Bx.Suff2@"
];
define Bx2Flags

! Compose 1) flattened suffix morphology with 2) boundary/flags rule

regex [ FlattenedMorphology .o. Bx2Flags ];
define FlattenedMorphologyBx

! Define rule for deleting person prefix tags.
! This is needed in the models with abstract tags, where all the
! person information is conveyed through suffixed tags.

regex [ 0 <- [ "1+" | "2+" | "3+" | "X+" ] ];
define rmPrefixPersonTag

! Compose together 1) removal of person prefix tags; 2) morphology with
! flattened suffixes and boundaries as flags; and 3) phonological rules
! post-flattening, i.e. rules concerning prefixes and those applying generally
! after boundary-based rules on prefixes and suffixes have been applied.
! Flags are treated as epsilon so that they will not interfere, and to retain
! the morpheme boundary flags.

set flag-is-epsilon ON
regex [ rmPrefixPersonTag .o. FlattenedMorphologyBx .o. PostPhonology ];
set flag-is-epsilon OFF

define PreSyncopeMorphology

! Convert flags representing morpheme boundaries back to the original
! morpheme boundary markers.

regex [ "@P.Bx.Pref@" -> "<" ] .o. [ "@P.Bx.Suff@" -> ">" ]
.o. [ "@P.Bx.Pref2@" -> "<<" ] .o. [ "@P.Bx.Suff2@" -> ">>" ] ;
define Flags2Bx

! Specify a rule to simplify adjacent sequences of morpheme boundary markers.
! Generally, this removes '<<' or '>>' (which do not toggle phonological rules)
! when there is a basic boundary '<' or '>' or another '<<' or '>>' next to them,
! or at the beginning or end of a word.

regex [ [ "<<" | ">>" ] -> 0 || [ "<<" | ">>" | "<" | ">" ] _ , _ [ "<<" | ">>" | "<" | ">" ] , .#. _ , _ .#. ];
define SimplifyBoundaries

! Compose together 1) morphology after all pre-syncope morphological rules;
! 2) rule for conversion of flags to morpheme boundaries; and 2) rule for
! simplifying morpheme boundary sequences.

regex [ PreSyncopeMorphology .o. Flags2Bx .o. SimplifyBoundaries ] ;

! Save the resultant FST (and name it):

save stack otw-verb-flattened-abstract-presyncope.fomabin

define PreSyncopeMorphologyBx

regex [[ "<" | ">" | "<<" | ">>" ] -> 0 ];
define removeBoundaries

regex PreSyncopeMorphologyBx .o. removeBoundaries;

save stack ciw-analyzer-verb-flattened-abstract-presyncope.fomabin

invert net

save stack ciw-generator-verb-flattened-abstract-presyncope.fomabin

clear stack

echo 'CREATED FLATTENED ABSTRACT PRESYNCOPE FST';

!!!!!
! Create a complete model using glossing tags, but with flattened suffixes.
!!!!!

! Read in entire morphology with flattened suffixation
! but using glossing tags.

read lexc verb_lexicon_flattened_glossing.lexc
define GlossingMorphology

! Read in phonological rules applying for suffixes and requiring
! a morpheme boundary '>' to be triggered.

source phonology-only-suffix-rules.xfscript
define SuffixPhonology

! Specify rule for retaining morpheme boundaries.
! 1) Basic prefix boundary markers '<' are attached with a flag.
! 2) All other boundary markers are converted to an appropriate flag.

regex [ [..] -> "@P.Bx.Pref@" || "<" _ ,, [..] -> "@P.Bx.Suff@" || ">" _
,, "<<" -> "@P.Bx.Pref2@" ,, ">>" -> "@P.Bx.Suff2@"
];
define Bx2Flags

! Compose morphology using glossing tags with rule for converting morpheme
! boundaries to flags.

regex [ GlossingMorphology .o. Bx2Flags ];
define GlossingMorphologyBxFlags

! Compose 1) minimalist model with boundary flags with 2) suffixal phonology
! and then all other pre-syncope phonology (concerning prefixes and rules
! to apply afterwards, not requiring triggering with morpheme boundaries).
! Flags need to be treated as epsilons so that they do not interfere as well
! as retain the flags marking morpheme boundaries.

set flag-is-epsilon ON
regex [ GlossingMorphologyBxFlags .o. SuffixPhonology .o. PostPhonology ];
set flag-is-epsilon OFF
define GlossingMorphologyFlagsBx

! Compose 1) the result of the previous step with 2) rule to convert boundary
! flags to the corresponding boundary markers and then 3) simplify morpheme
! boundary sequences (as described above).

regex [ GlossingMorphologyFlagsBx .o. Flags2Bx .o. SimplifyBoundaries ];

! Save the resultant FST, and name it.

save stack otw-verb-flattened-glossing-presyncope.fomabin

define PreSyncopeGlossingMorphologyBx

echo 'CREATED FLATTENED GLOSSING PRESYNCOPE FST';

!!!!!
! Post-syncope model with flattened suffixes and glossing tags
!!!!!

regex [[ "<" | ">" | "<<" | ">>" ] -> 0 ];
define removeBoundaries

! Read in the phonological rules implementing syncope.

source phonology-only-syncope-rules.xfscript
define Syncope

! Compose a flattened post-syncope model with glossing tags
! (but without morpheme boundaries).

set flag-is-epsilon ON
regex [ PreSyncopeGlossingMorphologyBx .o. removeBoundaries .o. Syncope ];
set flag-is-epsilon OFF

! Save generator and analyzer versions of this model.

save stack otw-analyzer-flattened-glossing-postsyncope.fomabin

invert net

save stack otw-generator-flattened-glossing-postsyncope.fomabin

define SyncopeGlossingMorphology

echo 'CREATED FLATTENED GLOSSING POSTSYNCOPE FSTs';

!!!!!
! Post-syncope model with flattened suffixes and abstract tags
!!!!!

! Convert all morpheme boundaries into corresponding flags.
! Since all phonological rules dependent on boundary marking have
! already been applied, we need not retain the actual markers anymore.

regex [ "<" -> "@P.Bx.Pref@" ,, ">" -> "@P.Bx.Suff@"
,, "<<" -> "@P.Bx.Pref2@" ,, ">>" -> "@P.Bx.Suff2@"
];
define Bx2Flags

! Compose morphology with all pre-syncope rules with boundary-to-flags rule.

regex [ PreSyncopeMorphologyBx .o. Bx2Flags ];
define PreSyncopeMorphologyBxFlags

! Compose 1) morphology with pre-syncope rules (and boundaries-as-flags)
! with 2) phonological rules for syncope.
! Flags need to be epsilons not to interfere as well as retain boundary flags.

set flag-is-epsilon ON
regex [ PreSyncopeMorphologyBxFlags .o. Syncope ];
set flag-is-epsilon OFF

define SyncopeMorphology

! Convert flags back to boundaries

regex [ "@P.Bx.Pref@" -> "<" ] .o. [ "@P.Bx.Suff@" -> ">" ]
.o. [ "@P.Bx.Pref2@" -> "<<" ] .o. [ "@P.Bx.Suff2@" -> ">>" ];
define Flags2Bx

! Compose 1) syncopated model (with flags for boundaries) with
! 2) rule for converting flags to boundaries.

regex [ SyncopeMorphology .o. Flags2Bx ];

! Save resultant morpho-phonological model with syncope (aka Odawa)
! and abstract tags.

save stack otw-verb-flattened-abstract-postsyncope.fomabin

echo 'CREATED FLATTENED ABSTRACT POSTSYNCOPE FST';

define Model

regex [ Model .o. removeBoundaries ];

save stack otw-analyzer-flattened-abstract-postsyncope.fomabin

invert net

save stack otw-generator-flattened-abstract-postsyncope.fomabin

! quit

!!!!!
! END
!!!!!
